Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.080

ESD board—Members—Elections, calling and notice.

Not later than the 25th day of August of every odd-numbered year, the executive director of the Washington state school directors' association shall call an election to be held in each educational service district within which resides a member of the board of the educational service district whose term of office expires on the second Monday of January next following, and shall give written notice thereof to each member of the board of directors of each school district in such educational service district. Such notice shall include instructions and procedures established by the Washington state school directors' association for the conduct of the election.

[ 2022 c 79 s 6; 2007 c 460 s 1; 2006 c 263 s 602; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.21.031.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.